Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-207.02
Accessibility barrier, defined.

Accessibility barrier shall mean anything which impedes entry into, exit from, or use of any building or facility by all people.

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 7.